Utah statutes.
61-2c-502.   Additional license fee.
(1)  An individual who applies for or renews a license shall pay, in addition
to any other fee required under this chapter, a reasonable annual fee:
(a)  determined by the division with the concurrence of the commission; and
(b)  not to exceed $18.
(2) (a)  An entity that applies for or renews an entity license shall pay, in
addition to any other fee required under this chapter, a reasonable annual
fee:
(i)  determined by the division with the concurrence of the commission; and
(ii)  not to exceed $25.
(b)  This Subsection (2) applies:
(i)  notwithstanding that an entity is operating under an assumed name
registered with the division as required by Subsection 61-2c-201(9); and
(ii)  to each branch office of an entity that is licensed under this chapter.
(3)  Notwithstanding Section 13-1-2, the following shall be paid into the fund
to be used as provided in this part:
(a)  a fee provided in this section;
(b)  a fee for certifying:
(i)  a school as a certified education provider;
(ii)  a prelicensing or continuing education course; or
(iii)  a prelicensing or continuing education provider as an instructor; and
(c)  a civil penalty imposed under this chapter.
(4)  If the balance in the fund that is available to satisfy a judgment
against a licensee decreases to less than $100,000, the division may make an
additional assessment to a licensee to maintain the balance available at
$100,000 to satisfy judgments.
